Montana, session 2025, SB305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 37-19-828, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-19-828. Funeral trust fund -- deposit of money. (1) (a) A party that provides services pursuant
to a contract for a prearranged funeral or related services and that receives money under the contract shall
deposit the money within 10 business days of receipt in a banking institution or invest the money in the stock of
a savings or building and loan association or in the shares of a credit union.
(b) The banking institution, savings or building and loan association, or credit union shall maintain
an office in this state and must be organized under the laws of this state, of another state, or of the United
States.
(c) Deposits or investments made as provided in this section must be insured by an instrumentality
of the federal government must comply with the prudent investor rule provided for in Title 72, chapter 38, part 9.
The rule may not be waived.
(2) Deposits or investments made pursuant to this section constitute a trust fund for the benefit of
the person contracting for the prearranged funeral or related services. The money must be placed in a separate
account in the name of the depositor as trustee for the person contracting for the prearranged funeral or related
services."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 305
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 305, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 305
INTRODUCED BY M. CUFFE
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING FUNERAL TRUST LAWS; REQUIRING FUNERAL TRUST FUNDS TO
COMPLY WITH THE PRUDENT INVESTOR RULE; AND AMENDING SECTION 37-19-828, MCA.”